Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201890-550
Transfer to Nebraska Cultural Preservation Endowment Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer an amount as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of section 82-331, not to exceed $750,000, from the General Fund to the Nebraska Cultural Preservation Endowment Fund on December 31, 2015, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 9.